Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
FILING DOCUMENTS

7-101-201. Filing requirements.

Part 3 of article 90 of this title, providing for the filing of documents, applies to any document filed or to be filed by the secretary of state pursuant to articles 101 to 117 of this title.

to (11) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1845, § 103, effective July 1, 2002; p. 1709, § 101, effective October 1, 2002.)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 732, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(6)(c) and (11) amended, p. 1310, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(5) and (11) amended, p. 976, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1845, § 103, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1709, § 101, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2313, § 218, effective July 1, 2004.

7-101-202. Forms - secretary of state to furnish upon request - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 734, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(2) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-101-203. Filing, service, and copying fees - subpoenas. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 734, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 1324, § 21, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-101-204. Effective time and date of document. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 735, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

IP(3) amended, p. 1310, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-101-205. Correcting filed document. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 736, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-101-206. Filing duty of secretary of state - manner of filing. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 736, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1311, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 977, § 49, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-101-207. Appeal from secretary of state's refusal to file document. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 737, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1311, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-101-208. Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 737, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-101-209. Certificates issued by secretary of state. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 737, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-101-210. Proof of delivery for filing. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 91, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1311, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.